Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-14] State of emergency. (a)
The governor may declare the existence of a state of emergency in the State by
proclamation if the governor finds that an emergency or disaster has occurred
or that there is imminent danger or threat of an emergency or disaster in any
portion of the State.

(b) A mayor may declare the existence of a
local state of emergency in the county by proclamation if the mayor finds that
an emergency or disaster has occurred or that there is imminent danger or
threat of an emergency or disaster in any portion of the county.

(c) The governor or mayor shall be the sole
judge of the existence of the danger, threat, or circumstances giving rise to a
declaration of a state of emergency in the State or a local state of emergency
in the county, as applicable. This section shall not limit the power and
authority of the governor under section 127A-13(a)(4).

(d) A state of emergency and a local state of
emergency shall terminate automatically sixty days after the issuance of a
proclamation of a state of emergency or local state of emergency, respectively,
or by a separate proclamation of the governor or mayor, whichever occurs first.
[L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next